sk-SK: Materiál nástrojov/náradia: Akáciové drevo; Akryl; Jelšové drevo; Hliník; Bambus; Bukové drevo; Mosadz; Liatina; Keramika; Bavlna; Sklo; Žula; Železo; Mramor; Melamín; Kov; Nylon; Olivové drevo; Plast; Polyetylén (PE); Polypropylén (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Guma; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Syntetika; Teakové drevo; Drevo; Iné
en: Tool/Utensil material: Acacia wood; Acrylic; Alder wood; Aluminum; Bamboo; Beech wood; Brass; Cast iron; Ceramic; Cotton; Glass; Granite; Iron; Marble; Melamine; Metal; Nylon; Olive wood; Plastic; Polyethylene (PE); Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Porcelain; Rubber; Silicone; Stainless steel; Steel; Synthetic; Teak wood; Wood; Other
da: Værktøjs-/redskabsmateriale: Akacietræ; Akryl; Alertræ; Aluminum; Bambus; Bøgetræ; Messing; Støbejern; Keramik; Bomuld; Glas; Granit; Jern; Marmor; Melamin; Metal; Nylon; Oliventræ; Plast; Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porcelæn; Gummi; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Teaktræ; Træ; Andet
fr: Matériau de l’outil/ustensile: Bois d'acacia; Acrylique; Bois d'aulne; Aluminum; Bambou; Bois de hêtre; Laiton; Fonte; Céramique; Coton; Verre; Granit; Fer; Marbre; Mélamine; Métal; Nylon; Bois d’olivier; Plastique; Polyéthylène (PE); Polypropylène (PP); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Porcelaine; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Synthétique; Bois de teck; Bois; Autre
es: Material de la herramienta/utensilio: Madera de acacia; Acrílico; Madera de aliso; Aluminio; Bambú; Madera de haya; Latón; Hierro fundido; Cerámica; Algodón; Vidrio; Granito; Hierro; Mármol; Melamina; Metal; Nylon; Madera de olivo; Plástico; Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Goma; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Sintético; Madera de teca; Madera; Otros
it: Materiale dello strumento/utensile: Legno di acacia; Acrilico; Legno di ontano; Alluminio; Bamboo; Legno di faggio; Ottone; Ghisa; Ceramica; Cotone; Vetro; Granito; Ferro; Marmo; Melammina; Metallo; Nylon; Legno d'ulivo; Plastica; Polietilene (PE); Polipropilene (PP); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Porcellana; Gomma; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Sintetico; Legno di teak; Legno; Altro
ja: 工具/器具材料: アカシア材; アクリル; アルダー材; アルミニウム; バンブー; ブナ材; 真鍮; 鋳鉄; セラミック; コットン; ガラス; 花崗岩; 鉄; 大理石; メラミン; 金属; ナイロン; オリーブ材; プラスチック; ポリエチレン (PE); ポリプロピレン (PP); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); 磁器; ゴム; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; スチール; 合成品; チーク材; 木材; その他
hr-HR: Materijal alata/pribora: Bagremovo drvo; Akril; Joha; Aluminij; Bambus; Bukovina; Mjed; Lijevano željezo; Keramika; Pamuk; Staklo; Granit; Željezo; Mramor; Melamin; Metal; Najlon; Maslinovo drvo; Plastika; Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Porculan; Guma; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Sintetika; Tikovina; Drvo; Ostalo
pl: Materiał narzędzia: Drewno akacjowe; Akryl; Drewno olszowe; Aluminium; Bambus; Drewno bukowe; Mosiądz; Żeliwo; Ceramika; Bawełna; Szkło; Granit; Żelazo; Marmur; Melamina; Metal; Nylon; Drewno oliwne; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polietylen (PE); Polipropylen (PP); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Porcelana; Guma; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Syntetyczne; Drewno tekowe; Drewno; Pozostałe
cs: Materiál nářadí/náčiní: Akátové dřevo; Akrylové; Olšové dřevo; Hliník; Bambus; Bukové dřevo; Mosaz; Železná litina; Keramika; Bavlna; Sklo; Žula; Železo; Mramor; Melamin; Kov; Nylon; Olivové dřevo; Plast; Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Guma; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Syntetické; Týkové dřevo; Dřevo; Jiné
ko: 도구/기구 자재: 아카시아나무; 아크릴; 오리나무; 알루미늄; 대나무; 너도밤나무; 황동; 주철; 세라믹; 면; 유리; 화강암; 철; 대리석; 멜라민; 금속; 나일론; 올리브나무; 플라스틱; 폴리에틸렌(PE); 폴리프로필렌(PP); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 도기; 고무; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 인조; 티크우드; 목재; 기타
sv: Verktyg/redskap - material: Acaciaträ; Akryl; Alträ; Aluminium; Bambu; Bokträ; Mässing; Gjutjärn; Keramisk; Bomull; Glas; Granit; Järn; Marmor; Melamin; Metall; Nylon; Olivträ; Plast; Polyeten (PE); Polypropen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porslin; Gummi; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Teakträ; Trä; Annat
ro-RO: Material instrumente/ustensile: Lemn de salcâm; Acrilic; Lemn de arin; Aluminiu; Bamboo; Lemn de fag; Alamă; Fontă; Ceramic; Bumbac; Sticlă; Granit; Fier; Marmură; Melamină; Metal; Nailon; Lemn de măslin; Plastic; Polietilenă (PE); Polipropilenă (PP); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Porțelan; Cauciuc; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Sintetic; Lemn de tec; Lemn; Altele
vi: Vật liệu dụng cụ/đồ dùng: Gỗ keo; Acrylic; Gỗ trăn; Nhôm; Tre; Gỗ dẻ; Đồng; Chảo gang; Gốm; Vải bông; Thủy tinh; Đá granit; Sắt; Cẩm thạch; Melamine; Kim loại; Nylon; Gỗ ô liu; Nhựa; Polyethylene (PE); Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Sứ; Cao su; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Tổng hợp; Gỗ tếch; Gỗ; Khác
pt-BR: Material de ferramenta/utensílio: Madeira de acácia; Acrílico; Madeira de aliso; Alumínio; Bambu; Madeira de faia; Latão; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Algodão; Vidro; Granito; Ferro; Mármore; Melamina; Metal; Nylon; Madeira de oliveira; Plástico; Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Porcelana; Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Sintético; Madeira de teca; Madeira; Outro
de: Werkzeug-/Utensilienmaterial: Akazienholz; Acryl; Erlenholz; Aluminium; Bambus; Buchenholz; Messing; Gusseisen; Keramik; Baumwolle; Glas; Granit; Eisen; Marmor; Melamin; Metall; Nylon; Olivenholz; Kunststoff; Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porzellan; Gummi; Silikon; Edelstahl; Stahl; Synthetisch; Teakholz; Holz; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Материал за инструмент/прибор: Акациева дървесина; Акрил; Дървесина от елша; Алуминий; Бамбук; Букова дървесина; Месинг; Чугун; Керамика; Памук; Стъкло; Гранит; Желязо; Мрамор; Меламин; Метал; Найлон; Маслиново дърво; Пластмаса; Полиетилен (PE); Полипропилен (PP); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Порцелан; Каучук; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Синтетичен; Тиково дърво; Дърво; Други
ru: Материал инструмента/прибора: Акация; Акрил; Ольха; Алюминий; Бамбук; Бук; Латунь; Чугун; Керамика; Хлопок; Стеклянные; Гранит; Железо; Мрамор; Меламин; Металл; Нейлон; Оливковое дерево; Пластик; Полиэтилен (ПЭ); Полипропилен (ПП); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Фарфор; Резина; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Синтетика; Тиковое дерево; Дерево; Другое
zh-TW: 工具/器具材質: 相思木; 壓克力; 榿木; 鋁; 竹子; 山毛櫸木; 黃銅; 鑄鐵; 陶瓷; 棉布; 玻璃; 花崗岩; 鐵; 大理石; 三聚氰胺; 金屬; 尼龍; 橄欖木; 塑膠; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 陶瓷; 橡膠; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 合成; 柚木材; 木材; 其他
el: Υλικό εργαλείου/σκεύους: Ξύλο ακακίας; Ακρυλικό; Σκλήθρα; Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Ξύλο οξυάς; Ορείχαλκος; Χυτοσίδηρος; Κεραμικό; Βαμβάκι; Γυαλί; Γρανίτης; Σίδερο; Μάρμαρο; Μελαμίνη; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Ξύλο ελιάς; Πλαστικό; Πολυαιθυλένιο (PE); Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Πορσελάνη; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Συνθετικό; Ξύλο τικ; Ξύλο; Άλλο
tr: Alet / Teçhizat malzemesi: Akasya ahşabı; Akrilik; Kızılağaç ağacı; Alüminyum; Bambu; Kayın ağacı; Pirinç; Dökme demir; Seramik; Pamuk; Cam; Granit; Demir; Mermer; Melamin; Metal; Plastik; Zeytin ağacı; Plastik; Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Porselen; Kauçuk; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Sentetik; Tik ağacı; Ahşap; Diğer
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเครื่องมือ/เครื่องใช้: ไม้อะคาเซีย; อะคริลิก; ไม้แอลเดอร์; อะลูมิเนียม; ไผ่; ไม้บีช; ทองเหลือง; เหล็กหล่อ; เซรามิก; สำลี; แก้ว; หินแกรนิต; เหล็ก; หินอ่อน; เมลามีน; โลหะ; ไนลอน; ไม้มะกอก; พลาสติก; โพลิเอทิลีน (PE); โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); พอร์ซเลน; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; สังเคราะห์; ไม้สัก; ไม้; อื่นๆ
nb: Verktøy-/redskapsmateriale: Akasietre; Akryl; Eltre; Aluminium; Bambus; Bøktre; Messing; Støpejern; Keramikk; Bomull; Glass; Granitt; Jern; Marmor; Melamin; Metall; Nylon; Oliventre; Plast; Polyetylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porselen; Gummi; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Teaktre; Trevirke; Annen
zh-CN: 工具/用具材质: 金合欢木; 丙烯酸; 赤杨木; 铝; 竹子; 山毛榉木; 黄铜; 铸铁; 陶瓷制品; 棉布; 玻璃; 花岗岩; 铁; 大理石; 三聚氰胺; 金属; 尼龙; 橄榄木; 塑料; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 瓷器; 橡胶; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 钢; 合成; 柚木材; 木头; 其他
nl: Materiaal gereedschap/gebruiksvoorwerp: Acaciahout; Acryl; Elzenhout; Aluminium; Bamboe; Beukenhout; Messing; Gietijzer; Keramiek; Katoen; Glas; Graniet; IJzer; Marmer; Melamine; Metaal; Nylon; Olijfhout; Plastic; Polyethyleen (PE); Polypropyleen (PP); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Porselein; Rubber; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Synthetisch; Teakhout; Hout; Andere
pt-PT: Material de ferramenta/utensílio: Madeira de acácia; Acrílico; Alnus; Alumínio; Bambu; Madeira de faia; Latão; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Algodão; Vidro; Granito; Ferro; Mármore; Melamina; Metal; Náilon; Madeira de oliveira; Plástico; Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Sintético; Madeira de teca; Madeira; Outro
hu: Szerszám/edény anyaga: Akácfa; Akril; Égerfa; Alumínium; Bambusz; Bükkfa; Sárgaréz; Öntöttvas; Kerámia; Pamut; Üveg; Gránit; Vas; Márvány; Melamin; Fém; Nejlon; Olajfa; Műanyag; Polietilén (PE); Polipropilén (PP); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Porcelán; Gumi; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Szintetikus; Tíkfa; Fa; Egyéb
fi: Työkalun/työvälineen materiaali: Akaasiapuu; Akryyli; Leppä; Alumiini; Bambu; Pyökkipuu; Messinki; Valurauta; Keraaminen; Puuvilla; Lasi; Graniitti; Rauta; Marmori; Melamiini; Metalli; Nailon; Oliivipuu; Muovi; Polyeteeni (PE); Polypropeeni (PP); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Posliini; Kumi; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Synteettinen; Tiikkipuu; Puu; Muu
lt-LT: Įrankio / indo medžiaga: Akacijos mediena; Akrilas; Alksnio mediena; Aliuminis; Bambukas; Buko mediena; Žalvaris; Ketus; Keramika; Medvilnė; Stiklas; Granitas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Marmuras; Melaminas; Metalas; Nailonas; Alyvmedis; Plastikas; Polietilenas (PE); Polipropilenas (PP); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Porcelianas; Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Sintetika; Tikmedžio mediena; Mediena; Kita
sl-SI: Material orodja/pripomočka: Akacijev les; Akril; Jelšev les; Aluminij; Bambus; Bukov les; Medenina; Lito železo; Keramika; Bombaž; Steklo; Granit; Železo; Marmor; Melamin; Kovina; Najlon; Oljčni les; Plastika; Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Porcelan; Guma; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Sintetika; Tikov les; Les; Drugo